Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.140

Quorum of directors.

A majority of the number of directors fixed by the bylaws, or in the absence of a bylaw fixing the number of directors, then of the number stated in the articles of incorporation, shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business, unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation or the bylaws: PROVIDED, That a quorum shall never consist of less than one-third of the number of directors so fixed or stated. The act of the majority of the directors present at a meeting at which a quorum is present shall be the act of the board of directors, unless the act of a greater number is required by this chapter, the articles of incorporation, or the bylaws.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 28.]